Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska41-201
Definitions, where found.

For purposes of sections 41-201 to 41-214, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 41-202 to 41-207 shall be used.

Laws 1982, LB 547, § 1.